Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.231

Signing of records.

(1) Each record delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW must be signed in the following manner:

(a) An initial certificate of limited partnership must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate.

(b) An amendment adding or deleting a statement that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate.

(c) An amendment designating as general partner a person admitted under RCW 25.10.571(3)(b) following the dissociation of a limited partnership's last general partner must be signed by that person.

(d) An amendment required by RCW 25.10.581(3) following the appointment of a person to wind up the dissolved limited partnership's activities must be signed by that person.

(e) Any other amendment must be signed by:

(i) At least one general partner listed in the certificate of limited partnership;

(ii) Each other person designated in the amendment as a new general partner; and

(iii) Each person that the amendment indicates has dissociated as a general partner, unless:

(A) The person is deceased or a guardian or general conservator has been appointed for the person and the amendment so states; or

(B) The person has previously delivered to the secretary of state for filing a statement of dissociation.

(f) A restated certificate of limited partnership must be signed by at least one general partner listed in the certificate, and, to the extent the restated certificate effects a change under any other subsection of this subsection (1), the certificate must be signed in a manner that satisfies that subsection.

(g) A statement of termination must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate or, if the certificate of a dissolved limited partnership lists no general partners, by the person appointed pursuant to RCW 25.10.581 (3) or (4) to wind up the dissolved limited partnership's activities.

(h) Articles of conversion must be signed by each general partner listed in the certificate of limited partnership.

(i) Articles of merger must be signed as provided in RCW 25.10.786(1).

(j) Any other record delivered on behalf of a limited partnership to the secretary of state for filing must be signed by at least one general partner listed in the certificate of limited partnership.

(k) A statement by a person pursuant to RCW 25.10.531(1)(d) stating that the person has dissociated as a general partner must be signed by that person.

(l) A statement of withdrawal by a person pursuant to RCW 25.10.351 must be signed by that person.

(m) A record delivered on behalf of a foreign limited partnership to the secretary of state for filing must be signed by at least one general partner of the foreign limited partnership.

(n) Any other record delivered on behalf of any person to the secretary of state for filing must be signed by that person.

(2) Any person may sign by an agent any record to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6110; 2009 c 188 s 204.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.